Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4053.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "nondisclosure agreement definitions act". Sec. 3. As used in the nondisclosure agreement act, "nondisclosure agreement" means an agreement or contract that includes a provision or clause that provides that a party to the agreement or contract is prohibited from disclosing, discussing, describing, or commenting on the agreement or contract or any of the contract's terms. Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S00558'25) or House Bill No. ?4052 (request no. H00558'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.